Mississippi, session 2026, SB2197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein: (a) "Administer" means the direct application of an epinephrine auto-injector to the body of an individual. (b)  "Authorized entity" means an entity or organization at or in connection with which allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis to patrons and the public may be present, including, but not limited to, recreation camps, youth sport leagues, amusement parks, restaurants, sports arenas and music venues. (c) "Department" means the Mississippi State Department of Health. (d)  "Epinephrine auto-injector" means a single-use device used for the automatic injection of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body. (e)  "Health care practitioner" means a physician or other individual licensed under Title 73, Mississippi Code of 1972, to treat, use and prescribe medicine and drugs for sick and injured humans in this state. (f) "Provide" means the supply of one or more epinephrine auto-injectors to an individual. (2)  A health care practitioner may prescribe epinephrine auto-injectors in the name of an authorized entity for use in accordance with this section, and pharmacists and medical providers may dispense epinephrine auto-injectors pursuant to a prescription issued in the name of any authorized entity.  A prescription issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for two (2) years. (3)  An authorized entity may acquire and stock a supply of epinephrine auto-injectors pursuant to a prescription issued in accordance with this section.  Epinephrine auto-injectors shall be stored in a location that is readily accessible during an emergency and in accordance with the epinephrine auto-injector's instructions for use and any additional requirements that may be established by the department.  An authorized entity shall designate employees or agents who have completed training required by this section to be responsible for the storage, maintenance, control and general oversight of epinephrine auto-injectors acquired by the authorized entity. (4)  An employee or agent of an authorized entity, or other individual who has completed the training required by this section, may use epinephrine auto-injectors prescribed pursuant to this section to do either of the following: (a)  Provide an epinephrine auto-injector to an individual who the employee, agent or other individual believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis, or the parent, guardian or caregiver of the individual, for immediate administration, regardless of whether the individual has a prescription for an epinephrine auto-injector or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy; or (b)  Administer an epinephrine auto-injector to any individual who the employee, agent or other individual believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the individual has a prescription for an epinephrine auto-injector or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy. (5)  An employee, agent or other individual described in subsection (3) or (4) of this section shall complete an initial anaphylaxis training program and shall complete subsequent training programs at least every two (2) years thereafter.  Training shall be conducted by a nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in emergency health treatment or by an entity or individual approved by the department.  The department may approve specific entities or individuals or may approve classes of entities or individuals to conduct training.  The entity that conducts the training shall issue a certificate, on a form developed by the department, to each individual who successfully completes the anaphylaxis training program.  Training may be conducted online or in person and, at a minimum, shall cover all of the following: (a)  How to recognize signs and symptoms of severe allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis; (b)  Standards and procedures for the storage and administration of an epinephrine auto-injector; and (c)  Emergency follow-up procedures. (6)  The following persons shall not be liable for any injuries or related damages that result from any act or omission taken pursuant to this section; provided, however, this immunity does not apply to an act or omission constituting willful or wanton conduct: (a)  An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine auto-injectors and its employees, agents and other individuals. (b)  An individual or entity that conducts the training described in this section, but only to the extent the injuries or related damages arise from the training conducted by the individual or entity.  The immunity provided in this subsection does not affect a manufacturer's liability regarding the design, manufacture, instructions regarding the use of or training regarding the use of an epinephrine auto-injector. (7)  The following persons shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability for actions authorized under this section: (a)  A physician who prescribes or dispenses an epinephrine auto-injector pursuant to this section, or who is consulted pursuant to this section, and who has no managerial authority over the individual administering the epinephrine auto-injector. (b)  A pharmacist who dispenses an epinephrine auto-injector pursuant to this section and who has no managerial authority over the individual administering the epinephrine auto-injector. (8)  The administration of an epinephrine auto-injector in accordance with this section is not the practice of medicine, except for licensed health care professionals, nor is it the practice of another profession that otherwise requires licensure.  This section does not alter or replace any other immunity or defense that may be available under state law. (9)  (a)  An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine auto-injectors shall submit to the department, on a form developed by the department, a report of each incident on the authorized entity's premises that involves the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.  The department shall annually publish a report that summarizes and analyzes all reports submitted to it under this subsection. (b)  The department may adopt rules necessary to carry out the intent of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.